Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.345

Effect of registration—Governing law.

A foreign corporation that registers to conduct affairs in this state is subject to RCW 23.95.500 relating to the effect of registration and the governing law for registered foreign corporations.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4118; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 69.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.